Louisiana, session 2026, HB480.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 13:5401(B)(1)(e) through (g) are hereby amended and reenacted to
read as follows:
§5401. District courts; reentry courts; subject matter
* * *
B. Participation in the workforce development sentencing program as
authorized by the provisions of this Section shall be subject to the following
provisions:
(1) The court may recommend that a defendant participate in the workforce
development sentencing program if all of the following criteria are satisfied:
* * *
(e) The defendant shall not have any prior felony convictions for any
offenses defined as a sex offense in R.S. 15:541.
(f) The crime before the court shall not be a crime of violence as defined in
R.S. 14:2(B), including domestic violence; however, the provisions of this
Subparagraph shall not apply to any of the following crimes of violence:
Page 1 of 3
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1023 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 480
(i) Aggravated battery (R.S. 14:34).
(ii) Second degree battery (R.S. 14:34.1).
(iii) Battery of a police officer (R.S. 14:34.2).
(iv) Disarming of a peace officer (R.S. 14:34.6).
(v) Aggravated assault (R.S. 14:37).
(vi) Aggravated assault with a firearm (R.S. 14:37.4).
(vii) Simple kidnapping (R.S. 14:45).
(viii) False imprisonment; offender armed with dangerous weapon (R.S.
14:46.1).
(ix) Aggravated arson (R.S. 14:51).
(x) Aggravated criminal damage to property (R.S. 14:55).
(xi) Home invasion (R.S. 14:62.8).
(xii) Second degree robbery (R.S. 14:64.4).
(xiii) Simple robbery (R.S. 14:65).
(xiv) Purse snatching (R.S. 14:65.1).
(xv) Aggravated flight from an officer (R.S. 14:108.1).
(e) The crime before the court shall not be a sex offense as defined in R.S.
15:541 or any criminal offense that resulted in a death.
(g) (f) Other criminal proceedings alleging commission of a crime of
violence as defined in R.S. 14:2(B), except those listed in, sex offense as defined in
R.S. 15:541 or any criminal offense in which a death occurred shall not be pending
against the defendant.
(h) The crime before the court shall not be a charge of any crime that
resulted in the death of a person.
(i) (g) The district attorney or appropriate prosecuting authority of the charge
for which a defendant may be considered for re-entry reentry court consents to
participation by the defendant in all cases wherein the defendant is convicted of an
eligible violent crime pursuant to R.S. 14:2.
Section 2. R.S. 13:5401(B)(1)(h) and (i) are hereby repealed in their entirety.
Page 2 of 3
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1023 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 480